Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 47.3 The Diesel Emissions Reduction Act

31-47.3-1.
Legislative findings.

Diesel emissions, due in large part to their high concentrations of particulate matter, are associated with severe and multiple health risks to the citizens of Rhode Island, including increased risks of cancer, decreased lung function, aggravated asthma, heart attacks and premature death. Reducing diesel pollution will also help advance the state’s climate protection goals and climate action plan by reducing black carbon pollution.

Diesel exhaust also contains nitrogen oxides, which contribute to the formation of ground-level ozone, or smog. Rhode Island continues to be classified as a “serious-nonattainment area” for ozone.

Reducing diesel pollution may help to stem the tide of the asthma epidemic in Rhode Island where more than one in ten (10) citizens have asthma. Rhode Island ranks eighth (8th) in the U.S. for the worst asthma rates overall, and has the fifth (5th) highest rate for children. Rhode Islanders pay about forty-one million dollars ($41,000,000) per year in asthma-associated health costs. Asthma is the most common chronic disease in children and responsible for the most school absences in Rhode Island.

The EPA, recognizing the harmful effects of diesel emissions, issued new fuel and engine emission standards that will reduce particulate matter emissions from engines model year 2007 and newer ninety percent (90%) below previous levels.

The same technology that reduces emissions by up to ninety percent (90%) for new engines can be retrofitted onto existing engines, which will continue to operate for years.

As a first step in tackling the diesel pollution problem in Rhode Island, school buses should be given high priority.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 219, § 1.

31-47.3-1.1.
Purpose.

This act shall be known and may be cited as “An Act Concerning Government Responsibility To Protect Public Health From Diesel Pollution.” The general purposes of this act are to:

Minimize human exposure to and health risks from diesel pollution;

Reduce health costs, missed school days, lost worker productivity and premature mortality linked to exposure to the diesel particulate matter (PM) and other diesel pollutants;

Achieve maximum feasible diesel particulate matter emissions reductions and diminished human exposure that is additional to the impact of federal diesel emission rules, which focus mostly on new engines;

Advance the state’s climate protection goals and climate action plan by reducing the amount of black carbon pollution emitted by diesels; and

Achieve health benefits for Rhode Island by ensuring state contracting and leasing takes advantage of retrofits that are occurring in the marketplace.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 184, § 1.

31-47.3-2.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter:

“Best available retrofit technology” means technology, verified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or California Air Resources Board (CARB) for achieving reductions in particulate matter emissions at the highest classification level for diesel emission control strategies that is applicable to the particular engine and application. Such technology shall not result in a net increase in nitrogen oxides.

“Closed crankcase ventilation system (CCV)” means a system that separates oil and other contaminant from the blow-by gases and routes the blow-by gases into a diesel engine’s intake system downstream of air filter.

“CMAQ” means the federal congestion mitigation and air quality improvement program, reauthorized by congress in 2005 by Sections 1101, 1103 and 1808 of the safe, accountable, flexible, efficient transportation equity act: a legacy for users (SAFETEA-LU) (Pub.L. 109-59, Aug. 10, 2005). SAFETEA-LU requires states and metropolitan planning organizations to give priority in distributing CMAQ funds for diesel engine retrofit projects, as well as other cost-effective emission reduction and congestion mitigation activities that benefit air quality.

“Contractor” means any person contracting directly or indirectly with the state to provide labor, services, materials and/or equipment for the performance of a public works contract. Contractor includes a prime contractor, subcontractor, and any contractor(s) hired by such subcontractor.

“DEM” means the Rhode Island department of environmental management.

“DERA” means the federal diesel emission reduction act, enacted by congress as sections 791 through 797 of the energy policy Act of 2005 (Pub. L. 109-58, Aug. 8, 2005).

“Director” refers to the director of the department of environmental management (DEM).

“DOT” means the Rhode Island department of transportation.

“Equipment list” means a list of all equipment owned, rented, or leased to be used on site.

“Fleet owner” means a person, business or the state that owns ten (10) or more heavy duty vehicles operating in Rhode Island. Included in the total are related businesses owned and operated by a person, business or state.

“Full-sized school bus” means a school bus, as defined in Rhode Island general law §

31-1-3

, which is a type 1 diesel school bus, including spare buses operated by or under contract to a school district, but not including emergency contingency vehicles or low usage vehicles.

“Heavy duty vehicle” or “vehicle” means any on-road or nonroad vehicle powered by diesel fuel and having a gross vehicle weight of greater than fourteen thousand (14,000) pounds, or in the case of a nonroad vehicle, powered by diesel fuel and an engine with a rating of at least seventy-five (75) horsepower, including, but not limited to, non-stationary generators.

“Inventory list” means a list of all equipment owned, rented, or leased by a contractor.

“Level 1 control” means a verified diesel emission control device that achieves a particulate matter (PM) reduction of twenty-five percent (25%) or more compared to uncontrolled engine emissions levels.

“Level 2 control” means a verified diesel emission control device that achieves a particulate matter (PM) emission reduction of fifty percent (50%) or more compared to uncontrolled engine emission levels.

“Level 3 control” means a verified diesel emission control device that achieves a particulate matter (PM) emission reduction of eighty-five percent (85%) or more compared to uncontrolled engine emission levels, or that reduces emissions to less than or equal to one one-hundredth (0.01) grams of (PM) per brake horsepower-hour. Level 3 control includes repowering or replacing the existing diesel engine with an engine meeting US EPA’s 2007 Heavy-duty Highway Diesel Standards, published in the federal register at 66 Fed. Reg. 5001 (January 18, 2001), or in the case of a nonroad engine, an engine meeting the US EPA’s Tier 4 Nonroad Diesel Standards, published in the federal register at 69 Fed. Reg. 38957 (June 19, 2004).

“Model year 2007 emission standards” means engine standards promulgated by the federal Environmental Protection Agency in 40 CFR Parts 69, 80 and 86.

“Public works contract” means a contract with a state agency for a construction program or project involving the construction, demolition, restoration, rehabilitation, repair, renovation, or abatement of any building, structure, tunnel, excavation, roadway, park or bridge; a contract with a state agency regarding the preparation for any construction program or project involving the construction, demolition, restoration, rehabilitation, repair, renovation, or abatement of any building, structure, tunnel, excavation, roadway, park or bridge; or a contract with a state agency for any final work involved in the completion of any construction program or project involving the construction, demolition, restoration, rehabilitation, repair, renovation, or abatement of any building, structure, tunnel, excavation, roadway, park or bridge.

“State agency” means each state board, commission, department, or officer, other than quasi-public corporations, the legislature or the courts, authorized by law to make rules or to determine contested cases.

The “state” shall mean state agencies or when related to “contractors” in this statute, the “state” shall mean the procuring agency or procuring agent.

“Ultra low sulfur diesel fuel” means diesel fuel having sulfur content of fifteen parts per million (15ppm) of sulfur or less, as defined by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency at 40 CFR section 80.520.

“Verified emissions control device” means a device that has been verified by the federal Environmental Protection Agency or the California Air Resources Board to reduce particulate matter emissions by a given amount.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 184, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 32.

31-47.3-3.
Reducing emissions from school buses.

Purpose. To reduce health risks from diesel particulate matter (DPM) to Rhode Island school children by significantly reducing tailpipe emissions from school buses, and preventing engine emissions from entering the passenger cabin of the buses.

Requirements for Rhode Island school buses:

By September 1, 2010, no full-size school bus with an engine model year 1993 or older may be used to transport school children in Rhode Island; and,

By September 1, 2010 any new bus added to current bus fleets or after September 1, 2010 whenever a new contract is entered into by a city, town, school district or the state all busses included in that contract shall be equipped with a closed crankcase ventilation system and either: (i) Shall be equipped with a Level 1, Level 2, or Level 3 device verified by the US Environmental Protection Agency or the California Air Resources Board; or (ii) Shall be equipped with an engine of model year 2007 or newer; or (iii) Shall achieve the same or higher diesel PM reductions through the use of alternative fuel such as compressed natural gas verified by CARB/EPA to reduce DPM emissions at a level equivalent to or higher than subparagraph (b)(2)(ii) above; and,

Providing there is sufficient federal or state monies, by September 1, 2012, all full-sized school buses transporting children in Rhode Island must be retrofitted with a closed crankcase ventilation system and either: (i) be equipped with a level 1, level 2, or level 3 device verified by the US Environmental Protection Agency or the California Air Resources Board; or (ii) be equipped with an engine of model year 2007 or newer; or (iii) achieve the same or higher diesel PM reductions through the use of an alternative fuel such as compressed natural gas verified by CARB/EPA to reduce DPM emissions at a level equivalent to or higher than subparagraph (b)(3)(ii) above.

Financial assistance to defray costs of pollution reductions called for in (b)(2):

The director shall work with the Rhode Island department of transportation or other authorized agencies to maximize the allocation of federal grants and loan monies provided for Rhode Island pursuant to the congestion mitigation and air quality improvement program (CMAQ) for diesel emissions reductions in federal FY 2008 and thereafter until the retrofit goals in this act are met.

Drawing upon any available federal or state monies, the director shall establish and implement a system of providing reimbursements consistent with this section to municipalities, vendors, or school bus owners for the purchase and installation of any CARB/EPA-verified emission control retrofit device together with the purchase and installation of closed crankcase ventilation system (CCV) retrofit device. To the extent practicable, in kind services will also be utilized to offset some of the costs. Incentive recipients must also certify that newly purchased or retrofitted buses with a level 3 technology will operate in the state of Rhode Island for a minimum of four (4) years unless the bus fleet owner’s contract with the school district or state has expired.

Priority community provision:

When federal funds or funds from state or other sources become available, for use under subsection (c), these shall be allocated by the director, to the extent practicable, as follows: (i) First, for control of emissions from school buses operating primarily in urban core or urban ring cities. Buses operating primarily in urban core or urban ring cities must be retrofitted to the best available standard as defined in paragraph (d)(3); (ii) Next, for control of emissions from buses not operating primarily in urban core or urban ring cities. (iii) Lastly, for buses operating primarily in urban core or urban ring cities already retrofitted with a level 1, level 2, or level 3 and/or crankcase ventilator device but that do not meet the best available standard as defined in paragraph (d)(3). Buses already meeting the best available standard as defined in paragraph (d)(3) will not be considered for this retrofitting program and municipalities, vendors, or school bus owners owning equipment retrofitted either prior to the implementation of this retrofit program or through another retrofit program with a level 1, level 2, level 3 and/or crankcase ventilator device will not be reimbursed as outlined in paragraph (c)(2).

Fleet owners currently holding contracts with Rhode Island school districts, and Rhode Island school districts owning their own fleets must comply with the retrofitted prioritization scheme as determined by the director and work with DEM to ensure that (i) By September 1, 2012 all buses are retrofit as outlined in paragraph (b)(3); and (ii) By September 1, 2010 no new bus may be added to their current fleets unless they meet standards outlined in paragraph (b)(2).

The “best available” standard is attained by all new buses (engine MY2007 and newer); by diesel buses engine model year 2003 to 2006, inclusive, that have been retrofitted with level 3-verified diesel particulate filters and closed crankcase ventilation systems; provided, however, that if DEM finds that the cost of a level 3 verified diesel particulate filter is not reasonable or otherwise not appropriate for use on a particular engine, the standard shall be at least a level 1 verified diesel emission control device and closed crankcase ventilation system; by diesel buses engine model year 1994 to 2002, inclusive, that has been retrofitted with at least level 1 verified diesel emission control devices and closed crankcase ventilation systems; and by natural gas buses that achieve the same or better emissions standards as a 2007 engine model year diesel bus.

“Urban core cities” means Central Falls, Newport, Providence, Pawtucket, and Woonsocket

“Urban ring cities” means North Providence, East Providence, West Warwick, Cranston, and Warwick.

To achieve the pressing public health and environmental goals of this act, DEM shall identify opportunities to achieve maximize PM reductions from diesel powered heavy duty vehicle or equipment that is owned by, operated by, or on behalf of, or leased by, or operating under a contract to a state agency or state or regional public authority (except vehicles that are specifically equipped for emergency response) and diesel powered waste collection and recycling vehicles that are owned, leased, or contracted to perform the removal or transfer or municipal, commercial or residential waste, or recycling services. No later than January 1, 2008, DEM shall present a report to the general assembly, governor, house committee on environment and natural resources, and the senate committee on environment and agriculture on such opportunities to maximum PM reductions from the aforementioned fleets including legislative changes, regulatory changes, funding sources, contract requirements, procurement requirements, and other mechanisms that will bring about maximum PM reductions from these two priority fleets. This report shall explore funding sources beyond CMAQ, including but not limited to Diesel Reductions Emissions Reduction Act (DERA) funds under the Federal Energy Act.

Severability. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid and after exhaustion of all further judicial review, the judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section or part of this act directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 7; P.L. 2010, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 184, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 32.

31-47.3-4.
Emission reduction strategies in new public works contracts.

Effective upon passage of this legislation, any solicitation for a public works contract with the state, and any contract entered into as a result of such solicitation, shall include provisions requiring all heavy duty vehicles used in the performance of such contract to adhere to the following requirements:

Contractors shall establish staging zones, provided that such space is available at no extra cost, for diesel vehicles away from the general public or sensitive receptors, including, but not limited to, hospitals, schools, and residential neighborhoods, to minimize the impact of emissions from idling vehicles.

Idling of diesel engines shall be limited to no more than five (5) minutes, except in cases where the engine must idle to perform normal operations, as with a cement truck.

Onroad and nonroad heavy-duty diesel vehicles, including generators, shall use only ultra-low sulfur diesel fuel.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 184, § 1.

31-47.3-5.
Use of emission control technology in new public works contracts.

Effective upon passage of this legislation, the department of transportation (DOT) shall implement contract requirements specified in subsection (b) on at least one project to be out to bid no later than September 30, 2010. Performance of the project, if deemed practicable by the director of DOT, must be started no later than six (6) months after the project bid has been awarded. DOT shall provide a summary report of the results of the project, implementation of these provisions and any recommendations to the governor and the general assembly no later than sixty (60) days after project completion. In selecting the project, the DOT shall prioritize otherwise eligible projects that:

Each have a total individual budget of no less than six million dollars ($6,000,000);

Serve areas in Rhode Island:

With highest population density; and/or

Exposed to a disproportionate amount of air pollution from diesel fleets.

Beginning January 1, 2013, any solicitation for a public works contract or contracts with the state funded in whole or in part by federal monies and having a total project cost of at least five million dollars ($5,000,000), and any contract entered into as a result of such solicitation, shall include provisions requiring all heavy duty vehicles used in the performance of such contract to adhere to the following requirements:

Subject to the provisions of subdivisions (2) through (4), onroad and nonroad heavy-duty diesel vehicles, including generators, shall be powered by engines with properly operating and maintained Level 3 controls. Provided, however, that if the department of environmental management (DEM) finds that no Level 3 verified emission control devices have been verified and are otherwise appropriate for use on particular engines, Level 2 verified devices shall be required; if neither Level 3 nor Level 2 devices have been verified and are otherwise appropriate for use on particular engines, Level 1 verified devices shall be required; and

emission control technology requirements of subdivision (1) shall not apply to:

Vehicles and equipment dedicated for snow removal;

Farm equipment;

Vehicles that are specially equipped and used for emergency response and vehicles that are used during a declared state of emergency and for the life of the project associated with the state of emergency;

Vehicles that are used to deliver equipment or material to and from the project site;

Standby generators; and

Vehicles used on the project for less than thirty (30) total work days over the life of the project; and

Unregulated, or pre-Tier 1 diesel engines are exempt from the requirements in subdivision (1). No later than December 1, 2011, DEM shall initiate a stakeholder process to determine how to reduce particulate emissions from unregulated, or pre-Tier 1 diesel engines, and how to create a statewide inventory of heavy duty diesel vehicles and how this inventory is published. The stakeholder process shall include representatives from industries that utilize pre-Tier 1 diesel engines. DEM shall report findings and recommendations from the stakeholder process to the governor and the general assembly no later than July 1, 2012; and

Emission controls shall be required only to the extent of available reimbursement from project funds covering the equipment purchase and installation labor costs of the controls, provided that at least one percent (1%) of the total of each project budget shall be dedicated for such reimbursement.

Funds shall be generally allocated to pay for the most cost-effective emission controls in terms of particulate pollution reduction per dollar spent.

Dedicated funds, subject to this subdivision (4), remaining after all eligible vehicles and equipment have been retrofit and reimbursement to contractors has been rendered subject to the provisions of this statute, may be considered part of the overall project budget as determined by the state.

Implementation. The requirements of subsections (a) and (b) shall be implemented as specified by the state, and shall include the following:

A blind bidding process;

When project bids are awarded, the state shall notify the contractor in writing of the total budget for retrofits according to the provisions of subdivision (b)(4);

Contractors must select vehicles and equipment to be retrofitted according to the requirements of subsection (b) within the budget specified by the state. Contractors shall give priority to retrofitting vehicles and equipment that:

Will likely spend the most time operating on the project;

Will disproportionately expose the surrounding community and sensitive receptors including, but not limited to, hospitals, schools and residential neighborhoods to diesel pollution; and

Are most cost-effective in terms of emission controls for particulate pollution reduction per dollar spent.

Construction shall not proceed until the contractor submits an equipment list of all heavy-duty vehicles to be used on site, in the format specified by the department of environmental management, including the following:

Contractor and subcontractor names and addresses, plus contact person responsible for the vehicles and or equipment; and

Documentation, including the technology type, EPA/CARB verification number/control Level, manufacturer, make, model, serial number of the retrofit device; the date the retrofit was installed; or in the case of a delayed shipment for retrofit parts and/or equipment, proof of purchase and the expected ship date from the manufacturer, for the retrofitted vehicles to be used on the project; and

Equipment, as further defined in subdivisions (c)(3) and (4), not meeting the requirements of this section shall not be used on the project site; provided, however, that:

If the contractor can provide documentation demonstrating that a retrofit was ordered for noncompliant equipment, but not arrived yet, and that the failure to retrofit in a timely manner was caused by circumstances beyond the contractor’s control, the noncompliant equipment may begin work on the project and operate on site for a maximum thirty (30) total work days or for additional time if authorized by the procuring agency.

If the contractor subsequently needs to bring on site equipment not on the equipment list specified in subdivision (4), the contractor shall submit written notification within forty-eight (48) hours to the procuring agency and the additional equipment shall be used on the project site for no more than thirty (30) total work days or for additional time if authorized by the procuring agency; provided that noncompliant equipment shall not be authorized for use more than three times during the life of the project.

Reporting.

The contractor shall submit monthly summary reports to the project manager, updating the equipment list, including diesel fuel use for the reporting time period for all equipment used in the performance of the contract. The addition or deletion of any equipment shall be included in the summary and noted in the monthly report.

By December 1, 2013, and December 1 of each subsequent year through 2015, the state shall submit contractors’ monthly summary reports, along with all inventory lists and equipment lists to DEM in the form requested.

By February 1, 2013, and February 1 of each subsequent year through 2015, DEM shall create and submit a summary report to the legislature. The report will be made accessible to the public by posting on the DEM website.

The report submitted by February 1, 2013 shall include:

A description of the state’s implementation of the new contract requirements;

An estimate of the resulting diesel emission reductions;

An estimate of the total population of heavy-duty diesel vehicles and equipment in the state;

An estimate of the total population of retrofitted heavy-duty diesel vehicles and equipment in the state;

A description of other appropriate measures of progress;

A description of problems encountered and opportunities for additional reductions in diesel emissions; and

Recommendations for any statutory changes including but not limited to:

The appropriate emissions control technology for specific vehicle groups;

The types of projects that shall require emissions controls;

The appropriate funding mechanism for continued implementation of the program;

The reporting requirements necessary to track and number heavy duty vehicles in use, and the number of retrofits that are achieved under the program, and

The appropriate enforcing agent for the program.

DEM shall provide written notice and opportunity for a public meeting and comment on the draft of the report due February 1, 2013.

DEM, DOT and other state agencies may promulgate regulations regarding the solicitation, bidding and awarding of public works projects as defined in subdivisions

31-47.3-5(b)(1)

, (b)(2), (c)(4), and (d)(1) and regarding enforcement as defined in §

31-47.3-6

, provided that the scope of the rulemaking authority granted hereunder shall be narrowly construed. No rule promulgated hereunder shall expand the scope of or impose more stringent limitations than those expressly set forth in this act.

Funding.

All costs associated with the purchase and installation by a contractor of the emission control technologies for a specific project in order to comply with the contract provisions required by subsections (a) and (b) shall be fully reimbursed from project funds within sixty (60) days of the technology installation; provided that the compliant control technology is installed within thirty (30) work days after the applicable vehicle is brought onto the project site unless it meets the requirements provided in subdivision (c)(5).

Retrofits installed with funds from the project shall remain on the heavy-duty diesel vehicle for the useful life of the emission control device or the vehicle or in the event the vehicle is sold out-of-state the retrofit technology may be removed at the contractor’s expense and used on a piece of equipment that performs work within Rhode Island no later than one year from the date it was removed from the original equipment.

Public education. Any project that is subject to public hearing requirements shall include at a minimum an overview of the diesel abatement strategies for the project as part of the public hearing presentation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 184, § 1.

31-47.3-5.1.
Establishment of the Rhode Island clean diesel fund.

There is hereby authorized and created within the Rhode Island department of environmental management (DEM) a Rhode Island clean diesel fund for the purpose of reducing emissions from heavy-duty diesel engines operating on state roads and helping companies improve supply chain efficiency as described in the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s SmartWay Program. The clean diesel fund will solicit projects that undertake eligible clean diesel measures and award grants from the fund to reimburse applicants for undertaking these measures.

DEM shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42 containing a list of eligible clean diesel measures that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Aerodynamic technologies;

Clean alternative fuel conversions;

Diesel emission reduction solutions;

Engine repowers;

Idle reduction technologies;

Low-rolling resistance tires;

Vehicle replacements;

Replacement or upgrades of transport refrigeration units or transport refrigeration unit generator sets; and

Routine maintenance shown to improve fuel efficiency or decrease emissions including, but not limited to, oil changes and cleaning of diesel particulate filters.

Equipment eligible for grant funding must:

Be intended for on-road use;

Be registered with the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles;

Be kept or garaged in Rhode Island as indicated on the vehicle registration issued by the division of motor vehicles;

Have been certified to DEM that fifty percent (50%) or more of vehicle miles traveled, or hours of operation, shall be projected to be in Rhode Island for at least five (5) years following the grant award; and

Meet any other criteria established in DEM rules and regulations promulgated by DEM pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

Administrative costs. The cost of administration and outreach by DEM shall not in any year exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), or ten percent (10%), of the fund appropriation, whichever is greater.

Project priority list. DEM shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42 that contain a project priority list for the Rhode Island clean diesel fund and the process through which an eligible applicant may submit an application for inclusion of a project on the project priority list. Upon issuance of the project priority list by DEM, the project priority list shall be used by DEM to determine the order in which grants shall be awarded.

Awarding of grants. DEM shall only award grant funds after verifying that the eligible measures outlined in the application have been implemented successfully by the applicant. If the final invoice price of an eligible measure is less than the initial quoted price, the grant award shall be reduced accordingly. Grants shall not be awarded to aid in compliance with existing mandates in state or federal law.

Grant amounts. For each eligible measure implemented by the applicant, DEM shall only issue grants for up to fifty percent (50%) of the total project cost. DEM shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42 that set the exact reimbursement amount for each eligible measure. The total project cost shall include both the material and labor needed to implement each eligible measure. No one applicant shall be awarded more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the grant funds appropriated during a given fiscal year, provided that the total grants requested exceed the amount appropriated. If the total amount of grants requested is less than the amount appropriated in a given fiscal year, DEM may allocate more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the fund to one applicant.

Vehicle replacements. For projects that propose to replace vehicles, the following conditions shall be met:

The applicant shall replace an older vehicle with a newer vehicle certified to more stringent emissions standards than the engine or vehicle being replaced;

The vehicle being replaced is a model year at least ten (10) years old;

The vehicle being replaced has a gross vehicle weight rating of thirty-three thousand one pounds (33,001 lbs.) or greater;

The replacement vehicle purchased by the applicant is a model year no more than three (3) years old;

The replacement vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating of thirty-three thousand one pounds (33,001 lbs.) or greater;

The replacement vehicle must be operable with remaining useful life as defined in rules and regulations promulgated by DEM pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42;

The engine of the vehicle being replaced must be scrapped or otherwise rendered inoperable in a manner consistent with rules and regulations promulgated by DEM pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42;

The amount of funding requested must contain the sale price of the vehicle, not including any interest or other finance charges; and

A vehicle purchased on a lease must be operated for the life of the project, with the life of the project being included in the application approved by DEM.

Transport refrigeration unit replacement. For projects that propose to replace or upgrade transport refrigeration units or transport refrigeration unit generator sets, the following conditions shall be met:

The transport refrigeration unit or transport refrigeration unit generator set being replaced or upgraded is powered by a diesel engine;

The transport refrigeration unit or transport refrigeration unit generator set being replaced or upgraded is being used on a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of thirty-three thousand one pounds (33,001 lbs.) or greater;

The replacement or upgraded transport refrigeration unit or transport refrigeration unit generator set produces fewer emissions than the equipment being replaced or upgraded; and

The replacement or upgraded transport refrigeration unit or transport refrigeration unit generator set meets emission criteria established by DEM in rules and regulations promulgated by DEM pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

Reporting. Projects receiving grant funding from DEM shall be subject to any reporting and data collection requirement specified in DEM rules and regulations promulgated by DEM pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

Penalties. Applicants awarded funds under this program may be penalized for breaching the terms of their grant award or for other project non-performance through the:

Cancellation of the grant award;

Recovery of all, or a portion of, the grant award;

Other fiscal penalties on an applicant based on the severity of non-performance and as specified in rules and regulations promulgated by DEM pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42; or

Prohibiting an applicant or a specific vehicle from participating in the program in the future.

Appropriation. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such funds as it deems appropriate for this program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 16, § 1.

31-47.3-6.
Enforcement.

Enforcement. The state shall include enforcement provisions in each contract subject to the provisions of §

31-47.3-4

and

31-47.3-5

, which shall include, authorization for the state to conduct random inspections of contractor’s equipment and records to ensure compliance provided that for the purpose of inspecting heavy duty vehicles and their records to determine compliance with these regulations, an agent or employee of DEM, upon presentation of proper credentials, shall have the right to enter any project location (with necessary safety clearances) where the designated vehicles are located or kept.

After January 1, 2013 any person who fails to submit any information, report, or statement required by this regulation, or who knowingly submits any false statement or representation in any application, report, statement, or other document filed, maintained or used for the purposes of compliance with this regulation may be subject to administrative penalties. Administrative penalties shall be assessed by the department of environmental management in accordance with section 42-17.6. In assessing penalties, DEM will consider factors, including, but not limited to, the willfulness of the violation, the length of time of noncompliance, whether the fleet made an attempt to comply, and the magnitude of noncompliance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 184, § 1.

31-47.3-7.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid and after exhaustion of all further judicial review, the judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section or part of this act directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 184, § 1.